test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_NoExtra_anini_gt-norm.yaml
     anini+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aninienhishiwaaing
     anini+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aninienhishinian
     anini+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aninienhishiniag
     anini+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aninienhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: aniniensishibanan
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: aniniensishibanag
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: aniniensishibaning
     anini+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aniniensish***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aniniensish***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aniniensish***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: aninienhishibanan
     anini+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: aninienhishibanag
     anini+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: aninienhishibaning
     anini+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aninienhish***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aninienhish***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aninienhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aniniensinaanibanan
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aniniensinaanibanag
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aniniensinaanibaning
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aniniensinaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aniniensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aniniensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aniniensiwaaibanan
     anini+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aniniensiwaaibanag
     anini+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aniniensiwaaibaning
     anini+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aniniensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aniniensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aniniensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aniniensiniibanan
     anini+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aniniensiniibanag
     anini+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aniniensiniibaning
     anini+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aniniensini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aniniensini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aniniensini***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aninienhinaanibanan
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aninienhinaanibanag
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aninienhinaanibaning
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aninienhinaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aninienhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aninienhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aninienhiwaaibanan
     anini+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aninienhiwaaibanag
     anini+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aninienhiwaaibaning
     anini+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aninienhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aninienhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aninienhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aninienhiniibanan
     anini+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aninienhiniibanag
     anini+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aninienhiniibaning
     anini+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aninienhini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aninienhini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aninienhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: aniniimishinaaniban
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aniniimishinaan***idig, idog***
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: aniniimishiwaaiban
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: aniniimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: aniniimishiniiban
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: aniniimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: aniniimishinaanan
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: aniniimishinaanag
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: aniniimishinaaning
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: aniniimishiwaaan
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: aniniimishiwaaag
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aniniimishiwaaing
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aniniimishinian
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aniniimishiniag
     anini+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aniniimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: aniniimishibanan
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: aniniimishibanag
     anini+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: aniniimishibaning
     anini+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aniniimish***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aniniimish***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aniniimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aniniiminaanibanan
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aniniiminaanibanag
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aniniiminaanibaning
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aniniiminaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aniniiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aniniiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aniniimiwaaibanan
     anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aniniimiwaaibanag
     anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aniniimiwaaibaning
     anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aniniimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aniniimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aniniimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aniniiminiibanan
     anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aniniiminiibanag
     anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aniniiminiibaning
     anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aniniimini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aniniimini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aniniimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aniniishinaanibanan
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aniniishinaanibanag
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aniniishinaanibaning
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aniniishinaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aniniishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aniniishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aniniishiwaaibanan
     anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aniniishiwaaibanag
     anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aniniishiwaaibaning
     anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aniniishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aniniishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aniniishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aniniishiniibanan
     anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aniniishiniibanag
     anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aniniishiniibaning
     anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aniniishini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aniniishini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aniniishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nianiniensimishinaan
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nianiniensimishiwaa
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nianiniensimishini
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nianinienhimishinaan
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nianinienhimishiwaa
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nianinienhimishini
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gianiniensimishinaan
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gianiniensimishiwaa
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gianiniensimishini
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gianinienhimishinaan
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gianinienhimishiwaa
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gianinienhimishini
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oaniniensimishinaan
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oaniniensimishiwaa
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oaniniensimishini
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oaninienhimishinaan
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oaninienhimishiwaa
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oaninienhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nianiniensimishiban
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nianiniensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nianinienhimishiban
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nianinienhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gianiniensimishiban
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gianiniensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gianinienhimishiban
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gianinienhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: oaniniensimishiban
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oaniniensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: oaninienhimishiban
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oaninienhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nianiniensimishan
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nianiniensimishag
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nianiniensimishing
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nianinienhimishan
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nianinienhimishag
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nianinienhimishing
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: gianiniensimishan
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gianiniensimishag
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gianiniensimishing
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: gianinienhimishan
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gianinienhimishag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gianinienhimishing
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: oaniniensimishan
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: oaniniensimishag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: oaniniensimishing
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: oaninienhimishan
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: oaninienhimishag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: oaninienhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nianiniensiminaaniban
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nianiniensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nianiniensimiwaaiban
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: nianiniensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nianiniensiminiiban
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nianiniensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nianinienhiminaaniban
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nianinienhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nianinienhimiwaaiban
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: nianinienhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nianinienhiminiiban
     +Px1anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nianinienhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: gianiniensiminaaniban
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gianiniensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: gianiniensimiwaaiban
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: gianiniensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: gianiniensiminiiban
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: gianiniensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: gianinienhiminaaniban
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gianinienhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: gianinienhimiwaaiban
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: gianinienhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: gianinienhiminiiban
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: gianinienhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: oaniniensiminaaniban
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oaniniensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: oaniniensimiwaaiban
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: oaniniensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: oaniniensiminiiban
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: oaniniensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: oaninienhiminaaniban
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oaninienhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: oaninienhimiwaaiban
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: oaninienhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: oaninienhiminiiban
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: oaninienhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: nianiniensiminaanan
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: nianiniensiminaanag
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: nianiniensiminaaning
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: nianiniensimiwaaan
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: nianiniensimiwaaag
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: nianiniensimiwaaing
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: nianiniensiminian
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: nianiniensiminiag
     +Px1anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: nianiniensiminiing
